Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB155.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 39A.020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Adjutant General" means the executive head of the Department of Military Affairs vested with general
direction and control authority for the department and the division of emergency management;
(2) "Animal health emergency" means an incident or situation which poses a major threat to the safety or
health of livestock as defined in KRS 246.010, poultry as defined in KRS 246.010, or other domesticated
animal so as to cause or threaten to cause the spread of disease, starvation, deadly injury, or other potential
loss of life;
(3) "Catastrophe" means a disaster or series of concurrent disasters which adversely affect the entire
Commonwealth of Kentucky or a major geographical portion thereof;
(4)[(3)] "Chief executive officer" means a:
(a) County judge/executive of a county;
(b) Mayor of a consolidated local government;
(c) Mayor of an urban-county government;
(d) Chief executive officer of a charter county government;
(e) Chief executive officer of a unified local government; or
(f) Mayor of a city;
(5)[(4)] "Comprehensive emergency management program" means the public safety program developed,
organized, implemented, administered, maintained, and coordinated by the Division of Emergency
Management and local emergency management agencies created pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapters
39A to 39F, to assess, mitigate, prepare for, respond to, or recover from, an emergency, declared emergency,
disaster, or catastrophe, or threat of any of those, as contemplated in KRS 39A.010 or as defined in this
section;
(6)[(5)] "Coordination" means having and exercising primary state or local executive branch oversight for the
purpose of organizing, planning, and implementing;
(7)[(6)] "County" means a county, urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local
government, or unified local government;
(8)[(7)] "Declared emergency" means any incident or situation declared to be an emergency, disaster, or
catastrophe by executive order of the Governor, or a county judge/executive, or a mayor, or the chief executive
of other local governments in the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;
(9)[(8)] "Director" means the director of the Division of Emergency Management of the Department of Military
Affairs;
(10)[(9)] "Disaster" means any incident or situation declared as such by executive action of the Governor, or the
President of the United States, pursuant to federal law;
(11)[(10)] "Disaster and emergency response" means the performance of all emergency functions, other than war-
related functions for which military forces are primarily responsible, including but not limited to: direction and
control, incident command, or management; communications; fire protection services; police services; medical
and health services; ambulance services; rescue; search and rescue or recovery; urban search and rescue;
engineering; alerting and warning services; resource management; public works services; nuclear, chemical,
biological, or other hazardous material or substance monitoring, containment, decontamination, neutralization,
and disposal; emergency worker protection, site safety, site operations and response planning; evacuation of
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
persons; emergency welfare services; emergency transportation; physical plant protection; temporary
restoration of public utility services; emergency lighting and power services; emergency public information;
incident investigation, hazards analysis, and damage assessment; and other functions related to effective
reaction to a disaster or emergency or catastrophe, or the potential, threatened, or impending threat of any
disaster or emergency or catastrophe, together with all other activities necessary or incidental to the
preparation for and carrying out of the functions set out in this subsection;
(12)[(11)] "Division" means the Division of Emergency Management of the Department of Military Affairs;
(13)[(12)] "Emergency" means any incident or situation which poses a major threat to public safety so as to cause,
or threaten to cause, loss of life, serious injury, significant damage to property, or major harm to public health
or the environment;
(14)[(13) (a)] "Executive action":
(a) Means:
1. All orders and guidelines related to a COVID-19 declared emergency issued by the Governor or
any state agency, the President of the United States or any federal agency, or a local
governmental agency; and
2. Industry-specific guidelines related to a COVID-19 declared emergency adopted by a state
agency that govern the industry; and
(b) Does not["Executive action"]:
1. [Does not ]Mean informal or indefinite statements or recommendations made by government
officials; or[and]
2. [Does not ]Create a duty of care;
(15)[(14)] "Integrated emergency management system" means the unified and multidisciplinary disaster and
emergency response infrastructure developed in the Commonwealth, under the coordination of the division,
using methods which align state or local administrative, organizational, and operational resources, to
accomplish the mission, goals, and objectives of the comprehensive emergency management program of the
Commonwealth;
(16)[(15)] "Local disaster and emergency services organization" means that organization of public and private
entities developed to carry out the multiagency disaster and emergency response of a city, county, urban-
county or charter county pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;
(17)[(16)] "Local emergency management agency" means the agency created, operated, and maintained to
coordinate the local comprehensive emergency management program and disaster and emergency response of
a city, county, and urban-county or charter county government pursuant to KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;
(18)[(17)] "Local emergency management director" or "Local director" means the executive head of the local
emergency management agency, appointed pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapters 39A to 39F;
(19)[(18)] "State emergency management agency" means the Division of Emergency Management of the
Department of Military Affairs; and
(20)[(19)] "State emergency management director" means the director of the Division of Emergency Management.
Section 2. KRS 39A.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In the event of the occurrence or threatened or impending occurrence of any of the situations or events
enumerated in KRS 39A.010, 39A.020, or 39A.030, the Governor may declare, in writing, that a state of
emergency exists. The Governor shall have and may exercise the following emergency powers during the
period in which the state of emergency exists:
(a) To enforce all laws, and administrative regulations relating to disaster and emergency response and to
assume direct operational control of all disaster and emergency response forces and activities in the
Commonwealth;
(b) To require state agencies and to request local governments, local agencies, and special districts to
respond to the emergency or disaster in the manner directed;
(c) To seize, take, or condemn property, for the duration of the emergency, and only for public use as
defined in KRS 416.675, excluding firearms and ammunition, components of firearms and ammunition,

CHAPTER 17 3
or a combination thereof, for the protection of the public or at the request of the President, the Armed
Forces, or the Federal Emergency Management Agency of the United States, including:
1. All means of transportation and communication;
2. All stocks of fuel of whatever nature;
3. Food, clothing, equipment, materials, medicines, and all supplies; and
4. Facilities, including buildings and plants, but excluding houses of worship, except to the extent
that such houses have become unsafe to a degree that would justify condemnation in the absence
of a state of emergency.
Compensation for property seized, taken, or condemned under this paragraph shall be determined using
the process in KRS 416.540 to 416.670 to determine value;
(d) To sell, lend, give, or distribute any of the property under paragraph (c) of this subsection among the
inhabitants of the Commonwealth and to account to the State Treasurer for any funds received for the
property;
(e) To make compensation for the property seized, taken, or condemned under paragraph (c) of this
subsection;
(f) To exclude all nonessential, unauthorized, disruptive, or otherwise uncooperative personnel from the
scene of the emergency, and to command those persons or groups assembled at the scene to disperse. A
person who refuses to leave an area in which a written order of evacuation has been issued in
accordance with a written declaration of emergency or a disaster may be forcibly removed to a place of
safety or shelter, or may, if this is resisted, be arrested by a peace officer. Forcible removal or arrest
shall not be exercised as options until all reasonable efforts for voluntary compliance have been
exhausted;
(g) To declare curfews and establish their limits;
(h) To prohibit or limit the sale or consumption of goods, in the event of a shortage of goods, excluding
firearms and ammunition, components of firearms and ammunition, or a combination thereof, or
commodities for the duration of the emergency;
(i) To grant emergency authority to pharmacists pursuant to KRS 315.500, for the duration of the
emergency;
(j) To request any assistance from agencies of the United States as necessary and appropriate to meet the
needs of the people of the Commonwealth;
(k) Upon the recommendation of the Secretary of State, to declare by executive order a different time or
place for holding elections in an election area for which a state of emergency has been declared for part
or all of the election area. The election shall be held within thirty-five (35) days from the date of the
suspended or delayed election. The executive order shall remain in effect until the date of the suspended
or delayed election regardless of the time limitations in KRS 39A.090 and shall not be changed except
by action of the General Assembly. The State Board of Elections shall establish procedures for election
officials to follow. Any procedures established under this paragraph shall be subject to the approval of
the Secretary of State and the Governor by respective executive orders; and
(l) Except as prohibited by this section or other law, to take action necessary to execute those powers
enumerated in paragraphs (a) to (k) of this subsection.
(2) Within thirty (30) days of a declared emergency, and every thirty (30) days thereafter, the Governor shall
report to the General Assembly, if in session, or to the Legislative Research Commission if the General
Assembly is not in session, on a form provided by the Commission detailing:
(a) All expenditures relating to contracts issued during the emergency under KRS 45A.085 or 45A.095, or
under any provision for which a state agency does not solicit bids or proposals for a contract; and
(b) All revenues received from the federal government in response to the declared emergency, any
expenditures or expenditure plan for the federal funds by federal program, the state agency or program
that was allocated the federal funds, and any state fund expenditures required to match the federal
funds.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) In the event of the occurrence or threatened or impending occurrence of any of the situations or events
contemplated by KRS 39A.010, 39A.020, or 39A.030, which in the judgment of a local chief executive officer
is of such severity or complexity as to require the exercise of extraordinary emergency measures, the county
judge/executive of a county other than an urban-county government, or mayor of a city or urban-county
government, or chief executive of other local governments or their designees as provided by ordinance of the
affected county, city, or urban-county may declare in writing that a state of emergency exists, and thereafter,
subject to any orders of the Governor, shall have and may exercise for the period as the state of emergency
exists or continues, the following emergency powers:
(a) To enforce all laws and administrative regulations relating to disaster and emergency response and to
direct all local disaster and emergency response forces and operations in the affected county, city,
urban-county, or charter county;
(b) To exclude all nonessential, unauthorized, disruptive, or uncooperative personnel from the scene of the
emergency, and to command persons or groups of persons at the scene to disperse. A person who
refuses to leave an area in which a written order of evacuation has been issued in accordance with a
written declaration of emergency or a disaster may be forcibly removed to a place of safety or shelter,
or may, if this is resisted, be arrested by a peace officer. Forcible removal or arrest shall not be
exercised as options until all reasonable efforts for voluntary compliance have been exhausted;
(c) To declare curfews and establish their limits;
(d) To order immediate purchase or rental of, contract for, or otherwise procure, without regard to
procurement codes or budget requirements, the goods and services essential for protection of public
health and safety or to maintain or to restore essential public services; and
(e) To request emergency assistance from any local government or special district and, through the
Governor, to request emergency assistance from any state agency and to initiate requests for federal
assistance as are necessary for protection of public health and safety or for continuation of essential
public services.
(4) In the event of the occurrence or threatened or impending occurrence of any animal health emergency,
which in the judgment of the Commissioner of Agriculture in consultation with the state veterinarian, is of
such severity or complexity as to require the exercise of extraordinary emergency measures, the
Commissioner of Agriculture may declare, in writing, that an animal health emergency exists and, subject
to any order of the Governor, may exercise emergency powers for the period the animal health emergency
exists or continues to:
(a) Order the immediate purchase or procurement of or contract for veterinary services from any
veterinarian or veterinarian technician licensed in the Commonwealth or any other state;
(b) Request the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet to issue any permits and waive any regulatory
requirements relating to the transportation of animal feed stock or medicine, including but not
limited to:
1. Vehicle weight limits; or
2. Driver safety restrictions;
and the secretary shall not deny the request absent good cause;
(c) Order the quarantine of any livestock, poultry, or other domesticated animal and any articles or
equipment capable of acting as a vector of communicable disease;
(d) Establish roadblocks on any roadway within the Commonwealth in order to prevent the
transportation of the livestock, poultry, domesticated animal, article, or equipment ordered
quarantined, with the assistance of:
1. State law enforcement;
2. Local law enforcement; or
3. Game wardens employed by the Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources;
(e) Order the immediate purchase, procurement, or rental of or contract for, without regard to
procurement requirements established in KRS Chapter 45A, the goods and services, including

CHAPTER 17 5
materials and services needed to stop the spread of a communicable disease, essential for the
protection of public health and safety or to maintain or restore essential public services; and
(f) Request any emergency assistance as is necessary for the protection of public health and safety or for
the continuation of essential public services from:
1. A local government or special district;
2. A state agency; or
3. The Governor in order to initiate any request for federal assistance.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow any governmental entity to impose additional restrictions
on:
(a) The lawful possession, transfer, sale, transport, carrying, storage, display, or use of firearms and
ammunition or components of firearms and ammunition;
(b) The right of the people to exercise free speech, freedom of the press, to petition their government for
redress of injuries, or to peaceably assemble; or
(c) The right of the people to worship, worship in person, or to act or refuse to act in a manner motivated
by a sincerely held religious belief.
(6)[(5)] Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow any governmental entity to impose restrictions on the
right of the people to:
(a) Peaceably assemble; or
(b) Worship, worship in person, or to act or refuse to act in a manner motivated by a sincerely held
religious belief.
(7)[(6)] (a) A governmental entity shall not prohibit or restrict a religious organization from operating or
engaging in religious services during a declared emergency to the same or any greater extent than other
organizations or businesses that provide essential services necessary and vital to the health and welfare
of the public are prohibited or restricted.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not prohibit the Governor from requiring religious organizations
to comply with neutral health, safety, or occupancy requirements that are applicable to all organizations
and businesses that provide essential services. However, no health, safety, or occupancy requirement
may impose a substantial burden on a religious organization or its services unless applying the burden
to the religion or religious service in the particular instance is essential to further a compelling
governmental interest and is the least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental
interest.
(c) A governmental entity shall not take any discriminatory action against a religious organization.
(8)[(7)] As used in this section:
(a) "Discriminatory action" includes any action taken by a governmental entity wholly or partially on the
basis that such organization is religious, operates or seeks to operate during a state of emergency, or
engages in the exercise of religion as protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the
United States to:
1. Adversely alter in any way the tax treatment of, cause any tax, penalty, or payment to be
assessed against, or deny, delay, or otherwise make unavailable an exemption from taxation;
2. Disallow, deny, or otherwise make unavailable a deduction for state tax purposes of any
charitable contribution made to or by a religious organization;
3. Impose, levy, or assess a monetary fine, fee, civil or criminal penalty, damages award, or
injunction; or
4. Withhold, reduce, exclude, terminate, adversely alter the terms or conditions of, or otherwise
make unavailable or deny any:
a. State grant, contract, subcontract, cooperative agreement, guarantee, loan, scholarship, or
other similar benefit from or to a religious organization;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
b. Entitlement or benefit under a state benefit program from or to a religious organization; or
c. License, certification, accreditation, recognition, or other similar benefit, position, or
status from or to any religious organization;
(b) "Governmental entity" means:
1. The Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions;
2. Any agency of the state described in KRS 12.020;
3. Any person acting under color of state law; and
4. Any private person suing under or attempting to enforce a law, rule, or administrative regulation
adopted by the state or any of its political subdivisions;
(c) "Religious organization" means:
1. A house of worship, including churches, synagogues, shrines, mosques, and temples;
2. A religious group, corporation, association, educational institution, ministry, order, society, or
similar entity, regardless of whether it is integrated or affiliated with a church or other house of
worship; or
3. Any officer, owner, employee, manager, religious leader, clergy, or minister of an entity or
organization described in this paragraph; and
(d) "Religious services" means a meeting, gathering, or assembly of two (2) or more persons organized by a
religious organization for the purpose of worship, teaching, training, providing educational services,
conducting religious rituals, or other activities that are deemed necessary by the religious organization
for the exercise of religion.
(9)[(8)] A religious organization may assert a violation of subsection (5)[(4)](c), (6)[(5)](b), or (7)[(6)] of this
section as a claim against a governmental entity in any judicial or administrative proceeding or as a defense in
any judicial or administrative proceeding without regard to whether the proceeding is brought by or in the
name of the governmental entity, any private person, or any other party. Sovereign, governmental, and
qualified immunity are waived to the extent of liability created under this section. An action asserting a
violation of this section may be commenced, and relief may be granted, without regard to whether the religious
organization commencing the action has sought or exhausted administrative remedies.
(10)[(9)] Remedies available to a religious organization under this section against a governmental entity include:
(a) Declaratory relief;
(b) Injunctive relief to prevent or remedy a violation of this section or the effects of such violation;
(c) Compensatory damages for pecuniary and nonpecuniary losses;
(d) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs; and
(e) Any other appropriate relief.
(11)[(10)] Remedies available to a religious organization under this section against a person not acting under color
of state law shall be limited to declaratory and injunctive relief.
(12)[(11)] This section:
(a) Shall be construed in favor of a broad protection of free exercise of religion;
(b) Shall be in addition to the protections provided under state and federal laws and constitutions. Nothing
in this section shall be construed to:
1. Preempt or repeal any state law or local ordinance that is equally or more protective of free
exercise of religion; or
2. Narrow the meaning or application of any state law or local ordinance protecting free exercise of
religion; and
(c) Applies to, and in cases of conflict, supersedes:

CHAPTER 17 7
1. Each statute of the Commonwealth that infringes upon the free exercise of religion protected by
this section, unless a conflicting statute is expressly made exempt from the application of this
section; and
2. Any ordinance, rule, administrative regulation, order, opinion, decision, practice, or other
exercise of a governmental entity's authority that infringes upon the free exercise of religion
protected by this section.
(13)[(12)] A religious organization shall bring an action to assert a claim under this section no later than two (2)
years from the date the person knew or should have known that a discriminatory action or other violation of
this section was taken against that religious organization.
Section 3. Whereas in the event of a natural disaster or declared animal health emergency, it is imperative
that critical resources and services be accessed immediately in order to contain and remedy the disaster, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 3, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version